Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2372.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Section 16-317, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE16-317. Secure online signature collection; municipal, county, school board, justice of the peace, constable; school board and precinct committeeman offices A. Notwithstanding any other statute in this title, the secretary of state shall provide a system for qualified electors to sign a nomination petition for candidates for city or town office, county office, school board office, justice of the peace, constable and the office of precinct committeeman by way of a secure internet portal. The system shall allow only those qualified electors who are eligible to sign a petition for a particular candidate to sign the petition, shall provide a method for the qualified elector's identity to be properly verified and shall provide for the secretary of state to transmit those filings or a facsimile of those filings to the officer in charge of elections for the appropriate office.  Through 2024, a candidate may choose to collect up to the minimum number of required nomination petition signatures by use of the online signature collection system prescribed by this section. Beginning in 2025, A candidate may choose to collect up to one hundred ten percent of the minimum number of required nomination petition signatures by use of using the online signature collection system prescribed by this section. B. This section applies only to candidates for city or town elected office, county office, school board office, justice of the peace, constable and the office of precinct committeeman. END_STATUTE